Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB182.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Corporal James D. Sloan Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Corporal James D. Sloan was born November 15, 1949, in Lilly Borough, Cambria County, and attended Penn-Cambria High School where he participated in football and wrestling.(2) Corporal Sloan enlisted in the United States Marine Corps and was promoted to Corporal on December 28, 1967.(3) During his service, Corporal Sloan received the National Defense Service Medal, Vietnam Campaign Medal, Vietnam Service Medal, the Combat Action Medal, the Navy Commendation Medal, the Purple Heart Medal and the Rifle Marksman Badge.12345678910111213141516171819 (4) Upon Corporal Sloan's return home from the Vietnam War he suffered greatly from the invisible wounds of war, especially post-traumatic stress disorder.(5) On March 12, 1971, Corporal James D. Sloan passed away due to suicide from post-traumatic stress disorder.(6) Corporal James D. Sloan's story of soldier suicide and the prevalence of post-traumatic stress disorder among veterans cannot be understated.(7) Corporal Sloan's story serves as a poignant example of the struggles faced by those who serve the United States and the urgent need for better support and resources for veterans suffering from mental illness.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 8377, carrying Pennsylvania Route 53 over Bear Rock Run in Lilly Borough, Cambria County, is designated the Corporal James D. Sloan Memorial Bridge. (c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0182PN0129 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021